South Dakota, session 2026, SB72.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That 2023 Session Laws, chapter 200, § 3 be AMENDED:
Section 3. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated
shall revert to the general fund on June 30, 2029.

26.535.17 2 72
An Act to extend the time for reverting moneys appropriated for the modernization of the
state's enterprise resource planning systems.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 72
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 72 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB72 ENROLLED